Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.077

Precious metal dealers—Licensure required.

No secondhand precious metal dealer doing business in this state may operate a business without first obtaining a business license from the local government in which the business is situated.

[ 2011 c 289 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 289: See note following RCW 19.60.010.